Hawaii statutes.
§150-30 Disposition of fees and charges.
All fees and charges received pursuant to this chapter shall be deposited with
the state director of finance to the credit of the general fund. [L 1945, c 90,
pt of §2; RL 1955, §26-14; am L 1963, c 114, §1 and c 193, §16; HRS §150-30; am
L 1987, c 164, §12]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next